Utah statutes.
40-1-4.   Copy of location notice to be recorded.

Within 30 days after the date of posting the location notice upon the claim, the locator, or the locator's assigns, shall record a substantial copy of the notice of location in the office of the county recorder of the county in which the claim is situated.



Amended by Chapter 85, 1999 General Session

